Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 2 Appellate Practice
5-6-45.
Operation of notice of appeal as supersedeas in criminal cases; bond; review.

In all criminal cases, the notice of appeal filed as provided in Code Sections 5-6-37 and 5-6-38 shall serve as supersedeas in all cases where a sentence of death has been imposed or where the defendant is admitted to bail. If the sentence is bailable, the defendant may give bond in an amount prescribed by the presiding judge, with security approved by the clerk, conditioned upon the defendant’s personal appearance to abide the final judgment or sentence of the court. If the judgment or sentence is or includes a fine which is unconditionally required to be paid, and is not required to be paid over a period of probation, nor as a condition of a suspended or probated sentence, nor as an alternative sentence, the bond may also be conditioned upon payment of the fine at the time the defendant appears to abide the final judgment or sentence.

If the defendant is a corporation which has been convicted as provided in Code Section 17-7-92, the presiding judge, on the motion of the defendant, prosecuting attorney, or on its own motion, may order that supersedeas be conditioned upon the posting of a supersedeas bond. Said order may be entered either before or after the filing of a motion for a new trial or notice of appeal. The bond shall be in an amount prescribed by the presiding judge, with security approved by the clerk, conditioned upon the defendant’s appearance, by and through a corporate officer, agent, or attorney at law, to satisfy the judgment, together with all costs and interest. If the corporation fails to make the bond as ordered, the prosecuting attorney or other proper officer may use any and all lawful process and procedures available to enforce and collect the judgment. Should final judgment be entered in favor of the defendant, the presiding judge shall order a refund of all amounts collected in satisfaction of the judgment. The State of Georgia, and its political subdivisions, district attorney, solicitor-general, sheriff, marshal, all other proper officers, and all agents and employees of the aforementioned persons shall be immune from all civil liability for acts and attempts to enforce and collect a judgment under this subsection.

Any supersedeas bond may be reviewed by the presiding judge on the motion of defendant, prosecuting attorney, or on its own motion, and the court may require new or additional security, or order the bond strengthened, increased, reduced, or otherwise amended as justice may reasonably require.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 449, 453; Code 1863, § 4171; Code 1868, § 4203; Code 1873, § 4263; Code 1882, § 4263; Penal Code 1895, § 1077; Penal Code 1910, § 1104; Code 1933, § 6-1005; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 9.

Cross references.

Termination of appeal bonds in criminal cases, §

17-6-1

.

Review of death sentences by Supreme Court, §

17-10-35

et seq.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 50.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 27, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an Act approved February 11, 1854 (Ga. L. 1854, p. 281), which abolished the office of solicitor of the City Court of Savannah, now the State Court of Chatham County, and transferred responsibility for the prosecution of criminal cases in said court to the solicitor general (now the district attorney) for the Eastern Judicial Circuit is confirmed. It shall be the duty of said district attorney to prosecute all criminal actions in said state court until otherwise specifically provided by law.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of this Act shall not affect the powers, duties, or responsibilities of the district attorney as successor to the office of solicitor general under the constitution, statutes, and common law of this state as provided by Code Section 15-18-1.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 29, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Except as otherwise authorized in this Act, on and after July 1, 1996, any reference in general law or in any local Act to the solicitor of a state court shall mean and shall be deemed to mean the solicitor-general of such state court.”

Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 30, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become effective on July 1, 1996.

“(b) The provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 15-18-62, relating to the qualifications for the office of solicitor-general of a state court, shall apply to any person elected or appointed to such office after July 1, 1996. Any person holding such office on July 1, 1996, may continue to hold such office for the remainder of the term to which such person was elected or appointed notwithstanding the fact that such person has not been a member of the State Bar of Georgia for three years if such person is otherwise qualified to hold the office of solicitor-general.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

5-6-46.
Operation of notice of appeal as supersedeas in civil cases; requirement of supersedeas bond or other security; fixing of amount; procedure upon no or insufficient filing; effect of bond as to liability of surety; punitive damages.

In civil cases, the notice of appeal filed as provided in Code Sections 5-6-37 and 5-6-38 shall serve as supersedeas upon payment of all costs in the trial court by the appellant and it shall not be necessary that a supersedeas bond or other form of security be filed; provided, however, that upon motion by the appellee, made in the trial court before or after the appeal is docketed in the appellate court, the trial court shall require that supersedeas bond or other form of security be given with such surety and in such amount as the court may require, conditioned for the satisfaction of the judgment in full, together with costs, interest, and damages for delay if the appeal is found to be frivolous. When the judgment is for the recovery of money not otherwise secured, the amount of the bond or other form of security shall be fixed at such sum as will cover the whole amount of the judgment remaining unsatisfied, costs on the appeal, interest, and damages for delay, unless the court after notice and hearing and for good cause shown fixes a lesser amount. When the judgment determines the disposition of the property in controversy as in real actions, trover, and actions to foreclose mortgages and other security instruments, or when such property is in the custody of the sheriff or other levying officer, or when the proceeds of such property or a bond for its value are in the custody or control of the court, the amount of the supersedeas bond or other form of security shall be fixed at such sum only as will secure the amount recovered for the use and detention of the property, the costs of the action, costs on appeal, interest, and damages for delay.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, in any civil case under any legal theory, including cases involving individual, aggregated, class-action, or otherwise joined claims, the amount of supersedeas bond or other form of security to be furnished during the pendency of all appeals or discretionary reviews of any judgment granting legal, equitable, or any other form of relief or damages, including compensatory, special, punitive, exemplary, or other damages, in order to stay execution of the judgment during the entire course of appellate review by any court shall be set in accordance with applicable laws or court rules, but the total supersedeas bond or other form of security that is required of all appellants collectively shall not exceed $25 million regardless of the value of the judgment.

If supersedeas bond or other form of security is not filed within the time specified by the judge, or if the bond or other form of security filed is found insufficient, a bond or other form of security may be filed at such time as may be fixed by the trial court.

By entering into an appeal or supersedeas bond or other form of security given pursuant to this Code section, the surety submits himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the court and irrevocably appoints the clerk of the court as the surety’s agent upon whom any papers affecting the surety’s liability on the bond may be served. The surety’s liability may be enforced on motion without the necessity of notice or an independent action.

Nothing in this Code section shall deprive the superior courts of their separate power to grant supersedeas under paragraph (1) of Code Section 15-6-9 nor deprive the appellate courts of the power to grant supersedeas in such manner as they may determine to meet the ends of justice.

If an appellee proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a party bringing an appeal, for whom the supersedeas bond or other form of security has been limited pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, is dissipating or secreting its assets, or diverting assets outside the ordinary course of business to avoid payment of a judgment, a court may require the appellant to post a bond or other form of security in an amount not to exceed the total amount of the judgment.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 449, 453; Code 1863, § 4171; Code 1868, § 4203; Ga. L. 1870, p. 416, § 1; Code 1873, § 4263; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 120, § 1; Code 1882, § 4263; Civil Code 1895, § 5552; Civil Code 1910, § 6165; Ga. L. 1917, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, § 6-1002; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 8; Ga. L. 1994, p. 346, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 980, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 5/HB 95.

Cross references.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 50.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 228, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Civil Litigation Improvement Act of 2000.’ ”

Ga. L. 2004, p. 980, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall apply to cases pending on or filed on or after May 17, 2004.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (1988).

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 37 (2000).

5-6-47.
Operation of notice of appeal and affidavit of indigence as supersedeas in civil cases; procedure for contests as to truth of affidavit.

In all civil cases where the party taking an appeal files an affidavit stating that because of his indigence he is unable to pay costs or to post a supersedeas bond, if any, as may be required by the trial judge as provided in Code Section 5-6-46, the notice of appeal and affidavit of indigence shall act as supersedeas.

Any party at interest or his agent or attorney may contest the truth of the affidavit of indigence by verifying affirmatively under oath that the same is untrue. The issue thereby formed shall be heard and determined by the trial court under the rules of the court. The judgment of the court on all issues of fact concerning the ability of a party to pay costs or give bond shall be final.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 9; Ga. L. 1966, p. 723, § 1.

Cross references.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 12.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Supersedeas, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 50.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

5-6-48.
Grounds for dismissal of appeal; amendments; correcting or supplementing record or transcript; effect of dismissal of appeal upon cross appeal; effect of deficiencies upon consideration of appeal.

Failure of any party to perfect service of any notice or other paper hereunder shall not work dismissal; but the trial and appellate courts shall at any stage of the proceeding require that parties be served in such manner as will permit a just and expeditious determination of the appeal and shall, when necessary, grant such continuance as may be required under the circumstances.

No appeal shall be dismissed or its validity affected for any cause nor shall consideration of any enumerated error be refused, except:

For failure to file notice of appeal within the time required as provided in this article or within any extension of time granted hereunder;

Where the decision or judgment is not then appealable; or

Where the questions presented have become moot.

No appeal shall be dismissed by the appellate court nor consideration of any error therein refused because of failure of any party to cause the transcript of evidence and proceedings to be filed within the time allowed by law or order of court; but the trial court may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, order that the appeal be dismissed where there has been an unreasonable delay in the filing of the transcript and it is shown that the delay was inexcusable and was caused by such party. In like manner, the trial court may order the appeal dismissed where there has been an unreasonable delay in the transmission of the record to the appellate court, and it is seen that the delay was inexcusable and was caused by the failure of a party to pay costs in the trial court or file an affidavit of indigence; provided, however, that no appeal shall be dismissed for failure to pay costs if costs are paid within 20 days (exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays) of receipt by the appellant of notice, mailed by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, of the amount of costs.

At any stage of the proceedings, either before or after argument, the court shall by order, either with or without motion, provide for all necessary amendments, require the trial court to make corrections in the record or transcript or certify what transpired below which does not appear from the record on appeal, require that additional portions of the record or transcript of proceedings be sent up, or require that a complete transcript of evidence and proceedings be prepared and sent up, or take any other action to perfect the appeal and record so that the appellate court can and will pass upon the appeal and not dismiss it. If an error appears in the notice of appeal, the court shall allow the notice of appeal to be amended at any time prior to judgment to perfect the appeal so that the appellate court can and will pass upon the appeal and not dismiss it.

Dismissal of the appeal shall not affect the validity of the cross appeal where notice therefor has been filed within the time required for cross appeals and where the appellee would still stand to receive benefit or advantage by a decision of his cross appeal.

Where it is apparent from the notice of appeal, the record, the enumeration of errors, or any combination of the foregoing, what judgment or judgments were appealed from or what errors are sought to be asserted upon appeal, the appeal shall be considered in accordance therewith notwithstanding that the notice of appeal fails to specify definitely the judgment appealed from or that the enumeration of errors fails to enumerate clearly the errors sought to be reviewed. An appeal shall not be dismissed nor consideration thereof refused because of failure of the court reporter to file the transcript of evidence and proceedings within the time allowed by law or order of court unless it affirmatively appears from the record that the failure was caused by the appellant.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 13; Ga. L. 1965, p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 10; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 624, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1986, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Cross references.

Briefs of appellant and cross appellant, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 39.

Service on opposing parties, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 43.

Argument and citation of authority, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 45.

Judgments deemed included and presented, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 46.

Presenting issue where record supplemented, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 48.

Motions in civil actions, hearing, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 6.3.

Transcript costs, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 41.3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article, “Synopses of 1968 Amendments Appellate Procedure Act and Georgia Civil Practice Act,” see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 503 (1968).

For article discussing Georgia court decision on questions of appellate practice and procedure, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1979).

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (1986).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (1988).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 35 (2005).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2008).

For annual survey on appellate practice and procedure, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2009).

For article, “Appellate Practice and Procedure,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 67 (2011).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 305 (2012).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 253 (2018).

For comment on Davis v. Davis,

222 Ga. 579

,

151 S.E.2d 123

(1966), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 259 (1967).

For comment on Durham v. Stand-By Labor of Ga., Inc.,

230 Ga. 558

,

198 S.E.2d 145

(1973), appearing below, see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 526 (1974).

5-6-49.
Bills of exceptions, exceptions pendente lite, assignments of error abolished; contents of motions for new trial and for j.n.o.v

Bills of exceptions, exceptions pendente lite, assignments of error, and all rules relating thereto are abolished.

Motions for new trial and for judgment notwithstanding the verdict need not set out portions of the record or transcript of evidence and it shall not be necessary that the grounds thereof be complete in themselves or be approved by the court; provided, however, that the motions must be sufficiently definite to inform the opposite party of the contention of the movant.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 3.

Cross references.

Rulings on motions for judgment notwithstanding the verdict and motions for new trial, §

9-11-50

.

5-6-50.
Procedure provided by article supersedes former appellate procedure.

The procedure provided in this article shall serve all purposes which a bill of exceptions or writ of error has served in the past; and, where under any law of force in this state provision is made for the taking of writs of error or bills of exception, the procedure prescribed in this article shall be deemed to apply in lieu thereof as to the procedure and as to all time requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 19.

5-6-51.
Forms.

The following suggested forms are declared to be sufficient, but any other form substantially complying therewith shall also be sufficient:

IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA
) Plaintiffs ) ) v. )
Civil action )
File no. )
) Defendants ) NOTICE OF APPEAL Notice is hereby given that and , defendants above-named, hereby appeal to the (Court of Appeals or Supreme Court) from the (describe order or judgment) entered in this action on , .
(date)
Motion for new trial (or motion for judgment n.o.v., etc.) was filed and overruled (or granted, etc.) on , .
(date)
The clerk will please omit the following from the record on appeal: 1. 2. 3. Transcript of evidence and proceedings will/will not be filed for inclusion in the record on appeal. This court, rather than the (Court of Appeals or Supreme Court) has jurisdiction of this case on appeal for the reason that . Dated: . Attorney for appellants Address (CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE) (2) Notice of appeal — Criminal cases. IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA
) The State (etc.) ) ) )
(Indictment) v. )
(Accusation) )
No.
) Defendant ) NOTICE OF APPEAL Notice is hereby given that , defendant above-named, hereby appeals to the (Court of Appeals or Supreme Court) from the judgment of conviction and sentence entered herein on , .
(date)
The offense(s) for which defendant was convicted is (are) , and the sentence(s) imposed is (are) as follows: . Motion for new trial (or motion in arrest of judgment, etc.) was filed and overruled on , .
(date)
The clerk will please omit the following from the record on appeal: 1. 2. 3. Transcript of evidence and proceedings will/will not be filed for inclusion in the record on appeal. This court, rather than the (Court of Appeals or Supreme Court) has jurisdiction of this case on appeal for the reason that . Dated: . Attorney for appellant Address (CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE) (3) Notice of cross appeal. IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA
) Plaintiffs ) ) v. )
Civil action )
File no. )
) Defendants ) NOTICE OF CROSS APPEAL Notice is hereby given that , one of the defendants above-named, hereby cross appeals to the (Court of Appeals or Supreme Court) from the (describe order or judgment) entered in this action on , .
(date)
Notice of appeal was heretofore filed on , .
(date)
The clerk will please include the following in the record on appeal, all of which were designated for omission by appellant: 1. 2. 3. Transcript of evidence and proceedings (will be filed) (will not be filed) (has already been designated to be filed by appellant) for inclusion in the record on appeal. Dated: . Attorney for cross appellant Address (CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE)

Click to view

(4)

Enumeration of errors.

The court erred in charging the jury on gross negligence.

The court erred in admitting the testimony of witness Smith concerning his opinion as to how the collision happened.

The court erred in refusing to grant a mistrial because of the misconduct of plaintiff’s attorney in oral argument.

The court erred in refusing to admit in evidence testimony of witness Jones concerning his estimate as to damages.

The court erred in denying defendant’s motion for continuance.

ENUMERATION OF ERRORS

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 20; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, §§ 8, 8A; Ga. L. 1973, p. 303, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 5.

Cross references.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Objections to records or transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 47.

Code Commission notes.

The sentences in paragraphs (1) and (2) relating to motion for new trial or motion for judgment n.o.v. would be included only where such a motion was filed, for the purpose of showing that the time for appeal from the judgment complained of had been automatically extended under Code Section 5-6-38.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” (Art. 2, Ch. 6, T. 5), see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” (Art. 2, Ch. 6, T. 5), see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For article, “The 1967 Amendments to the Georgia Civil Practice Act (Ch. 11, T. 9), and the Appellate Procedure Act (Art. 2, Ch. 6, T. 5),” see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 383 (1967).